da: Sprinklerresponstype: Control mode specific application (CMSA); Early suppression fast response (ESFR); Extended coverage (EC); Quick response (QR); Quick response extended coverage (QREC); Specific application (SA); Standard response (SR); Andet
zh-CN: 喷淋器响应类型: 控制模式特定应用 (CMSA); 早期抑制快速响应 (ESFR); 扩展覆盖 (EC); 快速响应 (QR); 快速响应扩展覆盖 (QREC); 特定应用 (SA); 标准响应 (SR); 其他
sv: Sprinklerresponstyp: Kontrolllägesspecifik applikation (CMSA); Tidig dämpning, snabb respons (ESFR); Utökad täckning (EC); Snabbt svar (QR); Snabbrespons för utökad täckning (QREC); Specifik app (SA); Standardsvar (SR); Annat
lt-LT: Purkštuvų atsako tipas: Konkrečios paskirties valdymo režimas (CMSA); Ankstyvo slopinimo greitasis reagavimas (ESFR); Išplėstinė aprėptis (EC); Greitas reagavimas (QR); Greitojo reagavimo išplėstinė aprėptis (QREC); Konkrečios paskirties (SA); Standartinis reagavimas (SR); Kita
nl: Sproeierreactietype: Control mode specific application (CMSA); Early suppression fast response (ESFR); Uitgebreide dekking (EC); Snelle respons (QR); Quick Response Extended Coverage (QREC); Specifieke app (SA); Standaardreactie (SR); Overig
nb: Sprinklerens responstype: Kontrollmodusspesifikk applikasjon (CMSA); Tidlig undertrykkelse, rask respons (ESFR); Utvidet dekning (EC); Rask respons (QR); Hurtigrespons utvidet dekning (QREC); Spesifikk app (SA); Standardrespons (SR); Annet
bg-BG: Тип реакция на пръскачката: Приложение със специфичен режим на управление (CMSA); За бързо потискане на пожар (ESFR); Разширено покритие (EC); Бърз отговор (QR); С бързо реагиране и разширено покритие (QREC); Специфично приложение (SA); Стандартен отговор (SR); Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta odziva brizgalke: Uporaba, specifična za Mode krmiljenja (CMSA); Zgodnji hitri odziv na supresijo (ESFR); Razširjeno kritje (EC); Hitri odziv (QR); Hitri odziv razširjene pokritosti (QREC); Posebna uporaba (SA); Standardni odziv (SR); Druga
it: Tipo di risposta dell'irrigatore: Applicazione specifica in modalità di controllo (CMSA); Risposta rapida alla soppressione precoce (ESFR); Copertura estesa (EC); Risposta rapida (QR); Copertura estesa a risposta rapida (QREC); Applicazione specifica (SA); Risposta standard (SR); Altro
pl: Typ reakcji zraszacza: Specjalnego zastosowania (CMSA); Wczesne tłumienie szybkiej reakcji (ESFR); Rozszerzone pokrycie (EC); Szybka reakcja (QR); Szybka reakcja rozszerzone pokrycie (QREC); Specjalnego zastosowania (SA); Standardowa reakcja (SR); Inne
vi: Loại phản ứng của đầu phun: Ứng dụng cụ thể chế độ điều khiển (CMSA); Phản ứng nhanh dập tắt sớm ESFR); Phạm vi bao phủ mở rộng (EC); Phản ứng nhanh (QR); Phản ứng nhanh phạm vi mở rộng (QREC); Ứng dụng cụ thể (SA); Phản ứng tiêu chuẩn (SR); Khác
hu: Szórónyílás-válasz típusa: Vezérlőmód-specifikus alkalmazás (CMSA); Fejlett automatikus tűzoltórendszer (ESFR); Kiterjesztett lefedettség (EC); Gyors válasz (QR); Gyors reagálású kiterjesztett lefedettség (QREC); Specifikus alkalmazás (SA); Standard válasz (SR); Egyéb
ja: スプリンクラー対応タイプ: 制御モード専用アプリ（CMSA）; 早期抑制迅速対応（ESFR）; 拡張カバレッジ（EC）; クイックレスポンス（QR）; クイックレスポンス拡張カバレッジ（QREC）; 専用アプリケーション（SA）; 標準レスポンス（SR）; その他
en: Sprinkler response type: Control mode specific application (CMSA); Early suppression fast response (ESFR); Extended coverage (EC); Quick response (QR); Quick response extended coverage (QREC); Specific application (SA); Standard response (SR); Other
fr: Type de réponse thermique du gicleur: Application spécifique au mode de contrôle (CMSA); Suppression précoce réponse rapide (ESFR); Couverture étendue (CE); Réponse rapide (QR); Couverture étendue réponse rapide (QREC); Application spécifique (AS); Réponse standard (RS); Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta reakcije prskalice: Kontrolni način specifične namjene (CMSA); Brzi odgovor rane supresije (ESFR); Proširena pokrivenost (EC); Brzi odgovor (QR); Brzi odgovor proširene pokrivenosti (QREC); Specifična primjena (SA); Standardni odgovor (SR); Ostalo
el: Τύπος απόκρισης καταιονιστήρα: Εφαρμογή ειδικής Mode ελέγχου (CMSA); Πρώιμη καταστολή ταχείας απόκρισης (ESFR); Εκτεταμένη κάλυψη (EC); Γρήγορη απόκριση (QR); Γρήγορη απόκριση εκτεταμένης κάλυψης (QREC); Ειδική εφαρμογή (SA); Τυπική απόκριση (SR); Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de resposta do aspersor: Aplicação específica do modo de controlo (CMSA); Resposta rápida de supressão precoce (ESFR); Cobertura alargada (EC); Resposta rápida (QR); Cobertura alargada de resposta rápida (QREC); Aplicação específica (SA); Resposta padrão (SR); Outro
th: ประเภทการตอบสนองของหัวฉีดน้ำดับเพลิง: การใช้งานตามโหมดควบคุมเฉพาะ (CMSA); ตอบสนองอย่างรวดเร็วเพื่อหยุดยั้งไฟในระยะเริ่มต้น (ESFR); กระจายพื้นที่ป้องกันที่ขยายออก (EC); ตอบสนองอย่างรวดเร็ว (QR); ตอบสนองอย่างรวดเร็วและกระจายพื้นที่ป้องกันที่ขยายออก (QREC); การใช้งานเฉพาะ (SA); ตอบสนองแบบมาตรฐาน (SR); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 灑水頭反應類型: 特定用途控制型 (CMSA); 早期抑制快速反應型 (ESFR); 廣範圍型 (EC); 快速反應型 (QR); 快速反應廣範圍型 (QREC); 特定用途型 (SA); 標準反應型 (SR); 其他
es: Tipo de respuesta del rociador: Aplicación específica modo de control (CMSA); Respuesta rápida de supresión temprana (ESFR); Cobertura extendida (CE); Respuesta rápida (QR); Cobertura extendida de respuesta rápida (QREC); Aplicación específica (SA); Respuesta estándar (SR); Otros
ro-RO: Tipul de răspuns al sprinklerului: Aplicație specifică mod control (CMSA); Suprimare timpurie răspuns rapid (ESFR); Acoperire extinsă (EC); Răspuns rapid (QR); Acoperire extinsă cu răspuns rapid (QREC); Aplicație specifică (SA); Răspuns standard (SR); Altele
tr: Sprinkler tepki tipi: Kontrol modlu özel uygulama (CMSA); Erken baskılama hızlı tepkili (ESFR); Genişletilmiş kapsam (EC); Hızlı tepkili (QR); Hızlı tepkili geniş kapsama (QREC); Özel uygulama (SA); Standart tepkili (SR); Diğer
ko: 스프링클러 반응 유형: 특수 응용 제어(CMSA); 조기 진압 신속 대응(ESFR); 살수 확장형(EC); 조기 대응형(QR); 조기 대응 살수 확장형(QREC); 특수 용도형(SA); 표준 대응형(SR); 기타
fi: Sprinklerin vastetyyppi: CMSA-tyyppinen (ohjaustilan mukainen käyttötarkoitus); ESFR-tyyppinen (nopeatoiminen varhaissammutus); EC-tyyppinen (laajennettu kattavuus); QR-tyyppinen (pikavaste); QREC-tyyppinen (pikavaste ja laajennettu kattavuus); SA-tyyppinen (tietty käyttötarkoitus); SR-tyyppinen (vakiovaste); Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de resposta do aspersor: Aplicativo de modo de controle específico (CMSA); Resposta rápida de supressão precoce (ESFR); Cobertura estendida (EC); Resposta rápida (QR); Cobertura estendida de resposta rápida (QREC); Aplicação específica (SA); Resposta padrão (RP); Outro
sk-SK: Typ reakcie zavlažovača: Špecifická aplikácia pre Mode riadenia (CMSA); Včasné potlačenie s rýchlou odozvou (ESFR); Rozšírené pokrytie (EC); Rýchla odozva (QR); Rozšírené pokrytie s rýchlou odozvou (QREC); Špecifická aplikácia (SA); Štandardná odozva (SR); Iné
ru: Тип срабатывания разбрызгивателя: Контролирующий спринклер специального применения (CMSA); Быстродействующий спринклер с ранним гашением (ESFR); Расширенное покрытие (EC); Быстрое реагирование (QR); Расширенное покрытие с быстрым реагированием (QREC); Специальное применение (SA); Стандартное реагирование (SR); Другое
de: Empfindlichkeit des Sprinklers: Control Mode Specific Application (CMSA); Early Suppression Fast Response (ESFR); Erweiterte Abdeckung (Extended Coverage, EC); Schnellantwort (Quick Response, QR); Schnelle erweiterte Abdeckung (Quick Response Extended Coverage, QREC); Spezifische Anwendung (Specific Application, SA); Normalsprinkler; Sonstiges
cs: Typ odezvy rozprašovače: Specifická aplikace pro režim ovládání (CMSA); Včasné potlačení a rychlá odezva (ESFR); Rozšířené pokrytí (EC); Rychlá odezva (QR); Rychlá odezva s rozšířeným pokrytím (QREC); Specifická aplikace (SA); Standardní odezva (SR); Jiné